New Jersey, session 222, A2195.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Department of Health 1[and] , in consultation with1 the Department of Education 1and the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education,1 shall develop and distribute to school districts and institutions of higher education guidelines on how to implement anti-vaping campaigns on their campuses.  The purpose of the guidelines shall be to assist school districts, colleges, and universities in equipping adolescents and young adults with research backed material on the dangers of vaping, or e-cigarette use, in an effort to combat the increased use of e-cigarettes among adolescents and young adults.  The guidelines shall reflect findings and incorporate content from the Tobacco Free for a Healthy NJ program and the Dont Get Vaped In training initiative developed by the Office of Tobacco Control and Prevention in the Department of Health.  The 1[Departments of Education and] Department of1 Health 1, in consultation with the Department of Education and the Office of the Secretary of Higher Education1 shall review 1[and update]1 the guidelines annually 1and update the guidelines as necessary1. In developing and updating the guidelines, the departments shall seek the input and recommendations of school district administrators, educators, health professionals, and other appropriate stakeholders. b.    The guidelines, developed pursuant to this section, at minimum, shall include recommendations for: (1)   implementing an in-school and on-campus multi-tiered anti-vaping campaign that focuses on theories that promote age-appropriate positive behavior change among adolescents and young adults; (2)   disseminating research-backed materials on the dangers of vaping, as it relates to:  its effects on the users lungs, effects on mental health, how it compares to cigarette smoking, dangers to pregnant women, and its impact on people in the workplace and small children; (3)   using decision-making models and decision-making aids to help students make healthy decisions and overcome peer pressure that encourages vaping; and (4)   incorporating marketing materials, such as pamphlets, to promote on-campus age-appropriate anti-vaping information to middle school students, high school students, and college age adults. c.     The Departments of Education and Health shall post the guidelines developed pursuant to this section on the Internet websites of each respective department.  The departments shall also include links on the websites to anti-vaping resources related to student e-cigarette use for school administrators, educators, staff, students, and their families. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and 1[shall first apply to the first full school year] the guidelines developed pursuant to section 1 of this act shall be released within one calendar year1 following the date of enactment.